apertium-nn-nb.nb.dix
<pardef n="l/a__vblex_adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>add</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>add</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>adde</l>       <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>       <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>adde</l>       <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>       <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aende</l>      <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atende</l>     <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>at</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>add</l>       <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>       <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>adde</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bastet og bundet__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v/ike__vblex_adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eken</l>      <r>ike<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eket</l>      <r>ike<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ikt</l>       <r>ike<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eket</l>      <r>ike<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ikt</l>       <r>ike<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekne</l>      <r>ike<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ikte</l>      <r>ike<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekne</l>      <r>ike<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ikte</l>      <r>ike<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikende</l>    <r>ike<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ik</l>        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ike</l>       <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikes</l>      <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eket</l>      <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ikt</l>       <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iker</l>      <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikes</l>      <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eik</l>       <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ek</l>        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ikte</l>      <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sv/ike__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>eken</l>      <r>ike<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eket</l>      <r>ike<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eket</l>      <r>ike<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekne</l>      <r>ike<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekne</l>      <r>ike<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikende</l>    <r>ike<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ik</l>        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ike</l>       <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikes</l>      <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eket</l>      <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iker</l>      <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikes</l>      <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eik</l>       <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ek</l>        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="f/ise__vblex_adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esen</l>      <r>ise<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eset</l>      <r>ise<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ist</l>       <r>ise<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eset</l>      <r>ise<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ist</l>       <r>ise<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esne</l>      <r>ise<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iste</l>      <r>ise<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esne</l>      <r>ise<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iste</l>      <r>ise<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isende</l>    <r>ise<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ise</l>       <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ises</l>      <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eset</l>      <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ist</l>       <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iser</l>      <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ises</l>      <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eis</l>       <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iste</l>      <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="la">              <i>l</i><par n="l/a__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="svike">           <i>sv</i><par n="sv/ike__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="avvike"><i>avv</i><par n="sv/ike__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fise"><i>f</i><par n="f/ise__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="illskrike"><i>illskr</i><par n="sv/ike__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="niskrike"><i>niskr</i><par n="sv/ike__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skrike"><i>skr</i><par n="sv/ike__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="snike"><i>sn</i><par n="v/ike__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="storskrike"><i>storskr</i><par n="sv/ike__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vike"><i>v</i><par n="v/ike__vblex_adj"/></e>
